Idaho, session 2025, S1168.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Title 48, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby amended
by the addition thereto of a NEW CHAPTER, to be known and designated as Chap-
ter 21, Title 48, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
CHAPTER 21
STANDARD PROTECTION FOR ALL RESOURCES ON KIDS' DEVICES ACT
48-2101. SHORT TITLE. This chapter shall be known and may be cited as
the "Standard Protection for All Resources on Kids' Devices Act."
48-2102. DECLARATION OF POLICY. The Idaho legislature, recognizing
the importance of mental health in the growth and education of minors and a
need to protect minors from accessing or downloading content that is harm-
ful, declares it to be the policy of the state to promote the mental health of
minors and adopt a comprehensive and proactive approach to reducing minors'
access to harmful content.
48-2103. DEFINITIONS. As used in this chapter:
(1) "Activate" means the process of powering on a device and associat-
ing it with a user account.
(2) "App" means a software application or electronic service that may
be run or directed by a user on a computer, mobile device, or any other gen-
eral purpose computing device.
(3) "App store" means a publicly available website, software applica-
tion, or other electronic service that distributes apps from third-party de-
velopers to users of a computer, mobile device, or any other general purpose
computing device.
(4) "Content" means media accessible on a device, including but not
limited to live or recorded television shows, movies, music, books, games,
and apps.
(5) "Developer" means any person that owns or controls an app available
on an app store.


(6) "Device" means a tablet or smartphone that is capable of connecting
to the internet and is manufactured on or after January 1, 2026.
(7) "Filter" means software installed on a device that is capable of
preventing the device from accessing or displaying obscene material or con-
tent that is harmful to minors through internet browsers or search engines
via mobile data networks, wired internet networks, and wireless internet
networks. Additionally, a filter shall be capable of preventing the device
from accessing material that is not suitable for minors pursuant to the pro-
visions of section 48-2105, Idaho Code.
(8) "Harmful to minors" means material that:
(a) The average person applying contemporary community standards would
find, taking the material as a whole and with respect to minors, is de-
signed to appeal to, or is designed to pander to, the prurient interest;
(b) Is devoted to or principally consists of descriptions of actual,
simulated, or animated displays or depictions of any of the following,
in a manner patently offensive with respect to minors:
(i) Pubic hair, anus, vulva, genitals, or nipples of the female
breast;
(ii) Touching, caressing, or fondling of nipples, breasts, but-
tocks, anuses, or genitals; or
(iii) Sexual intercourse, masturbation, sodomy, bestiality, oral
copulation, flagellation, excretory functions, exhibitions, or
any other sexual act; and
(c) Taken as a whole, lacks serious literary, artistic, political, or
scientific value for minors.
(9) "Internet" means the global information system that is logically
linked together by a globally unique address space based on the internet
protocol (IP), or its subsequent extensions, and that is able to support
communications using the transmission control protocol/internet proto-
col(TCP/IP) suite, or its subsequent extensions, or other IP-compatible
protocols, and that provides, uses, or makes accessible, either publicly
or privately, high-level services layered on communications and related
infrastructure.
(10) "Manufacturer" means a person or company that:
(a) Is engaged in the business of manufacturing a device; and
(b) Has a commercial designated registered agent as required by section
30-21-402, Idaho Code.
(11) "Minor" means an individual under eighteen (18) years of age who
is not emancipated, married, or a member of the armed forces of the United
States.
(12) "Obscene material" means the same as that term is defined in sec-
tion 18-4101, Idaho Code.
(13) "Password" means a string of characters or numbers or other secure
method used to enable, deactivate, modify, or uninstall a filter on a device.
(14) "Smartphone" means an electronic device that combines a cellular
phone with a handheld computer, typically offering internet access through a
browser or search engine, data storage, text messaging, and email capabili-
ties.


(15) "Tablet" means an internet-ready device equipped with an operating
system, touchscreen display, rechargeable battery, and the ability to sup-
port access to a cellular network.
(16) "Virtual private network" or "VPN" means a technology that creates
a secure, encrypted connection over the internet to a remote server owned by
a VPN provider, allowing users to transmit data privately and anonymously by
masking the user's IP address and location.
48-2104. FILTER REQUIRED. (1) Beginning on January 1, 2026, all de-
vices activated in this state must:
(a) Contain a filter;
(b) Determine the age of the user during activation and account setup;
(c) Enable the filter for minor users;
(d) Allow a password to be established for the filter;
(e) Notify the user of the device when the filter blocks the device from
accessing a website; and
(f) Provide the password-holding user the opportunity to deactivate
and reactivate the filter.
(2) A device sold with a filter that complies with the provisions of
this chapter and that is not capable of being disabled shall not be required
to comply with the provisions of this section.
48-2105. FILTER CAPABILITIES AND REQUIREMENTS. A filter, when acti-
vated on a device, shall possess the capability to:
(1) Prevent the device from accessing or displaying obscene material or
content that is harmful to minors;
(2) Prevent downloads on the device;
(3) Notify the minor's parent or guardian of any download attempts or
attempts to bypass the filter;
(4) Prevent the use of a VPN on the device; and
(5) Allow a parent or guardian to use a password to override the protec-
tions established in subsections (1) through (4) of this section.
48-2106. APP STORES -- ADDITIONAL REQUIREMENTS. (1) Beginning on Jan-
uary 1, 2026, if a device provides access to an app store, the device's man-
ufacturer shall require all app developers who sell or provide apps on such
app store to identify, as to all apps sold or provided:
(a) Whether such app has the ability to display, access, or link to ob-
scene material or content that is harmful to minors or may contain ad-
vertisements that include obscene material or content that is harmful
to minors; and
(b) Whether the app has the ability to bypass parental control set-
tings.
(2) If an app is identified as possessing any of the capabilities iden-
tified in subsection (1) of this section, the manufacturer shall display
such information whenever such app is attempted to be downloaded to the de-
vice.
(3) An app that possesses the capabilities identified in subsection
(1) of this section shall not be downloaded to a device unless the correct
filter password has been entered.


48-2107. MANUFACTURER LIABILITY. (1) Beginning January 1, 2026, a
manufacturer of a device shall be subject to civil and criminal liability if:
(a) The device is activated in this state;
(b) The device does not comply with the requirements described in sec-
tions 48-2104 through 48-2106, Idaho Code; and
(c) A minor accesses obscene material or content that is harmful to mi-
nors on the device.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (1) of this section,
this section does not apply to a manufacturer that makes a good faith effort
to provide a device that, upon activation of the device in this state, au-
tomatically enables a generally accepted and commercially reasonable filter
that blocks obscene material and content that is harmful to minors on all in-
ternet browsers and search engines accessed on the device in accordance with
the provisions of section 48-2105, Idaho Code.
(3) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to create a cause of ac-
tion against the retailer of a device.
48-2108. DEVELOPER LIABILITY. (1) Beginning January 1, 2026, a devel-
oper shall be subject to civil and criminal liability if:
(a) The developer's app is available on devices in this state on or af-
ter January 1, 2026;
(b) The developer does not correctly identify the capabilities of the
app pursuant to section 48-2106(1), Idaho Code; and
(c) A minor accesses obscene material or content that is harmful to mi-
nors using the app.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (1) of this section,
this section does not apply to a developer who makes a good faith effort to
correctly identify the capabilities of an app.
(3) Nothing in this section shall be construed to create a cause of ac-
tion against the manufacturer of a device.
48-2109. PROCEEDINGS BY THE ATTORNEY GENERAL. (1) Whenever the attor-
ney general has reason to believe that a person violated or is violating the
provisions of this chapter, the attorney general, acting in the public in-
terest, may bring an action in the name of the state against such person:
(a) To enjoin any action that constitutes a violation of this chapter by
the issuance of a temporary restraining order or preliminary or perma-
nent injunction;
(b) To recover from the alleged violator a civil penalty not to exceed
five thousand dollars ($5,000) per violation, and not to exceed a total
of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) in aggregate in any specific case,
as determined by the court; and
(c) To recover from the alleged violator the attorney general's reason-
able expenses, investigative costs, and attorney's fees.
(2) The attorney general may seek the revocation of any license or cer-
tificate authorizing a manufacturer to engage in business in this state.
(3) For purposes of assessing a penalty pursuant to this section, a man-
ufacturer is considered to have committed a separate violation for each de-
vice manufactured on or after January 1, 2026, that violates the provisions
of section 48-2104, Idaho Code.


SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.